Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 1 General Provisions

29-2-60.
Petition for jurisdiction change; retention of jurisdiction for limited matters.

A guardian may petition to remove the guardianship to the jurisdiction of the court of the county in this state in which the minor resides.

Upon the filing of a petition to remove the guardianship to another county in this state, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor. The court of the county in which the guardian was appointed shall grant the petition for removal only if the court determines that the removal is in the best interest of the minor.

Before the removal of the guardianship to another county in this state, the guardian shall file with the court of the county to which the guardianship is to be removed certified copies of all the records pertaining to the guardianship.

Following removal of a guardianship to another county in this state, the court of that county shall have the same jurisdiction over the guardian as if the guardian had been first appointed in that county, and every case growing out of or affecting the guardianship shall be heard and tried only in the county to which the guardianship has been removed.

The court in which an action or proceeding is pending or which has issued an order for a settlement of accounts, removal, or sanction of a guardian shall retain jurisdiction of such matters even when the guardianship has been removed to another county.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.